Washington statutes.
RCW 18.84.140

Application of chapter—Exemption for authorized scope of practice.

Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit or restrict the practice of a profession by a person who is either registered, certified, licensed, or similarly regulated under the laws of this state who is performing services within the person's authorized scope of practice.

[ 1991 c 222 s 6.]